Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1793.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2303 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 2303. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"mRNA vaccine." A vaccine that includes a substance that stimulates the production of antibodies and provides immunity against disease by introducing messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) that corresponds to a viral protein.* * *Section 2. Section 2325 of Title 3 is amended by adding a 12345678910111213141516171819 subsection to read:§ 2325. Use of biologicals, antibiotics, genetic material, chemicals, diagnostic agents and other substances.* * *(d) mRNA vaccine.--In addition to restrictions imposed by the department under subsection (c), it shall be unlawful to administer, treat or inject a domestic animal with an mRNA vaccine.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1793PN2203 - 2 - 123456789